Maryland, session 2026, HB0300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
2–901.
(a) In this section, “State contract” means any agreement entered into by the
State.
(a–1) This section does not apply to:
(1) a State contract relating to the purchase, redevelopment, or operation
of a racing facility or training facility site as those terms are defined under § 10–601 of the
Economic Development Article; OR
(2) A STATE CONTRACT ENTERED INTO BY THE OFFICE OF
INTERNATIONAL TRADE IN THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE RELATING TO THE
DEVELOPMENT OF INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS ACTIVITIES AND OPPORTUNITIES
AUTHORIZED UNDER § 3–303 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
(b) Except as required by State or federal law, a State contract may not include:
(1) a provision that requires the State to indemnify, defend, or hold
harmless another person without an appropriation of State funds for that purpose;
(2) a provision by which the State agrees to binding arbitration or any
other binding extrajudicial dispute resolution process;
– 1 –

Ch. 374 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) a provision that names a jurisdiction or venue for any action or dispute
against the State other than a court of proper jurisdiction in the State;
(4) a provision that requires the State to agree to limit the liability for any
direct loss to the State for bodily injury, death, or damage to real property or tangible
personal property of the State caused by the negligence, intentional or willful misconduct,
fraudulent act, recklessness, or other tortious conduct of a person or a person’s employees
or agents or a provision that would otherwise impose an indemnification obligation on the
State;
(5) a provision that requires the State to be bound by a term or condition
that:
(i) is unknown to the State at the time of signing a contract;
(ii) may be unilaterally changed by the other party; or
(iii) is electronically accepted by a State employee without authority;
(6) a provision that provides for a person other than the Attorney General
of Maryland to serve as legal counsel for the State, unless provided under § 6–106 of the
State Government Article;
(7) a provision that is inconsistent with the State’s obligations under Title
3 or 4 of the General Provisions Article;
(8) a provision prohibited under § 7–237 of this article;
(9) a provision for automatic renewal that obligates the State to allocate
funding in subsequent fiscal years; or
(10) a provision that limits the State’s ability to recover the difference in the
cost of a replacement contractor to perform the services not performed by the original
contractor, to the extent that the sum of the amount paid to the replacement contractor and
the amount paid to the original contractor exceed the costs provided for in the contract with
the original contractor.
(c) If a State contract contains a provision listed under subsection (b) of this
section, the provision is void ab initio and the contract containing that provision shall be
enforceable as if it did not contain the provision.
(d) A State contract that contains a provision listed under subsection (b) of this
section shall be governed by and construed in accordance with State law, notwithstanding
any term or condition to the contrary in the contract.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 374
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –